Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-327
Film vehicle, defined.

Film vehicle means any motor vehicle or trailer used exclusively by a nonresident production company temporarily on location in Nebraska producing a feature film, television commercial, documentary, or industrial or educational videotape production.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 27.